North Carolina statutes. Chapter 25C. Sales of Artwork.
Article 1. Artwork on Consignment.

§ 25C-1.
Definitions.

As used in this Article unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Art dealer” means an individual, partnership, firm, association, or corporation that undertakes to sell a work of fine art created by someone else;

“Artist” means the creator of a work of fine art;

“On consignment” means delivered to an art dealer for the purpose of sale or exhibition, or both, to the public by the art dealer; and

“Work of fine art” means an original art work that is:

A visual rendition, including a painting, drawing, sculpture, mosaic, or photograph;

A work of calligraphy;

A work of graphic art, including an etching, lithograph, offset print, or silk screen;

A craft work in materials, including clay, textile, fiber, wood, metal, plastic, or glass; or

A work in mixed media, including a collage or a work consisting of any combination of works included in this subdivision.

History.

1983, c. 822, s. 1; 1989, c. 464, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Public Art, Public Space, and the Panorama Right, ,” see 55 Wake Forest L. Rev. 597 (2020).

§ 25C-2.
Interest of art dealer who accepts works of fine art on consignment.

If an art dealer accepts a work of fine art on a fee, commission, or other compensation basis on consignment from the artist:

The art dealer is, with respect to that work of fine art, the bailee of the artist;

The work of fine art is bailment property in which the art dealer has no legal or equitable interest until the work is sold to a bona fide third party; and

The proceeds of the sale of the work of fine art are bailment property in which the art dealer has no legal or equitable interest until the amount due the artist from the sale, minus the agreed commission, is paid.

History.

1983, c. 822, s. 1.

§ 25C-3.
Status of works of fine art subsequently purchased by art dealer for his own account.

Notwithstanding the subsequent purchase of a work of fine art by the art dealer directly or indirectly for the art dealer’s own account, a work of fine art that is bailment property when initially accepted by the art dealer remains bailment property until the purchase price minus the agreed upon commission, is paid in full to the artist.

History.

1983, c. 822, s. 1.

§ 25C-4.
Creditors of art dealer may not reach works of fine art on consignment with art dealer.

Property that is bailment property under this Article is not subject to the claims, liens, or security interests of the creditors of an art dealer.

History.

1983, c. 822, s. 1; 1989, c. 464, s. 1.

§ 25C-5.
Risk of loss; insurable interest.

Nothing in this Article shall affect any provision of law pertaining to the risk of loss between or among the parties to a consignment agreement under this Article or pertaining to the insurable interest of any such party.

History.

1983, c. 822, s. 1; 1989, c. 464, s. 1.

§§ 25C-6 through 25C-9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.